apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="wr/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="salespe/rson__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ople</l>      <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rsons</l>     <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rson</l>      <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hit__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="che/quebook__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ckbooks</l>   <r>quebook<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ckbook</l>    <r>quebook<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="v/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="jar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ring</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="armo/ured__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r>ured<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ascend/ancy__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>encies</l>    <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ency</l>      <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ancies</l>    <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ancy</l>      <r>ancy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jewel/ler__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>ler<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>ler<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="phon/ey__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ey</l>        <r>ey<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ey<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mo/uldy__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ldy</l>       <r>uldy<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="alumn/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hipp/ie__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>ie<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dat/um__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="meag/re__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>er</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ficus__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quit__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ted</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ted</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="wag/gon__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="temp/o__n">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/are__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aring</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ared</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ore</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ared</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ares</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="zero__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="stri/fe__n">
  <e>       <p><l>fes</l>       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fe</l>        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="whir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ring</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>red</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="alumnus">         <i>alumn</i><par n="alumn/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="apparatus">       <i>apparatus</i><par n="ficus__n"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="armoured">        <i>armo</i><par n="armo/ured__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ascendancy">      <i>ascend</i><par n="ascend/ancy__n"/></e>
<e lm="bare">            <i>b</i><par n="b/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beset">           <i>beset</i><par n="hit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cargo">           <i>cargo</i><par n="zero__n"/></e>
<e lm="chequebook">      <i>che</i><par n="che/quebook__n"/></e>
<e lm="datum">           <i>dat</i><par n="dat/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="defer">           <i>defer</i><par n="jar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fling">           <i>fl</i><par n="wr/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="halo">            <i>halo</i><par n="zero__n"/></e>
<e lm="hippie">          <i>hipp</i><par n="hipp/ie__n"/></e>
<e lm="jeweller">        <i>jewel</i><par n="jewel/ler__n"/></e>
<e lm="junkie">          <i>junk</i><par n="hipp/ie__n"/></e>
<e lm="lacklustre">      <i>lacklust</i><par n="meag/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="manifesto">       <i>manifesto</i><par n="zero__n"/></e>
<e lm="mar">             <i>mar</i><par n="jar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meagre">          <i>meag</i><par n="meag/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mouldy">          <i>mo</i><par n="mo/uldy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="offset">          <i>offset</i><par n="hit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="phoney">          <i>phon</i><par n="phon/ey__adj"/></e>
<e lm="proviso">         <i>proviso</i><par n="zero__n"/></e>
<e lm="quit">            <i>quit</i><par n="quit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recur">           <i>recur</i><par n="jar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="salesperson">     <i>salespe</i><par n="salespe/rson__n"/></e>
<e lm="salvo">           <i>salvo</i><par n="zero__n"/></e>
<e lm="sombre">          <i>somb</i><par n="meag/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="star">            <i>star</i><par n="jar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strife">          <i>stri</i><par n="stri/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="tar">             <i>tar</i><par n="jar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tempo">           <i>temp</i><par n="temp/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="vie">             <i>v</i><par n="v/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="virtuoso">        <i>virtuos</i><par n="temp/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="waggon">          <i>wag</i><par n="wag/gon__n"/></e>
<e lm="war">                  <i>war</i><par n="jar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="whir">            <i>whir</i><par n="whir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wring">           <i>wr</i><par n="wr/ing__vblex"/></e>
